Maryland, session 2025, SB0808.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
7–302.
(e) (4) (i) Except as provided in paragraph (5) of this subsection, from the
fines collected by a political subdivision as a result of violations enforced by speed
monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, stop sign monitoring systems, school
bus monitoring cameras, bus lane monitoring systems, or noise abatement monitoring
systems, a political subdivision:
1. May recover the costs of implementing and administering
the speed monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, STOP SIGN MONITORING
SYSTEMS, school bus monitoring cameras, bus lane monitoring systems, or noise
abatement monitoring systems; and
2. Subject to subparagraphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this
paragraph, may spend any remaining balance solely for public safety purposes, including
pedestrian or highway safety programs.
Article – Transportation
21–707.1.
(a) This section applies only in Prince George’s County.
(b) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Agency” means a law enforcement agency that is authorized to issue a
citation for a violation of the Maryland Vehicle Law or of local traffic laws or regulations.
(3) (i) “Owner” means the registered owner of a motor vehicle or lessee
of a motor vehicle under a lease of 6 months or more.
(ii) “Owner” does not include:
1. A motor vehicle leasing company; or

SENATE BILL 808 3
2. A holder of a special registration plate issued under Title
13, Subtitle 9, Part III of this article.
(4) “Recorded image” means images recorded by a stop sign monitoring
system:
(i) On:
1. Two or more photographs;
2. Two or more microphotographs;
3. Two or more electronic images;
4. Videotape; or
5. Any other medium; and
(ii) Showing a motor vehicle and, on at least one image or portion of
tape, clearly identifying the registration plate number of the motor vehicle.
(5) “Stop sign monitoring system” means a device designed to capture a
recorded image of a violation.
(6) (i) “Violation” means a failure to come to a complete stop at a stop
sign in violation of § 21–707 of this subtitle.
(ii) “Violation” does not include any action a driver is instructed to
take by a police officer.
(c) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) through (5) (6) of this subsection, an agency
may use stop sign monitoring systems:
(i) On highways located in a school zone maintained by a local
jurisdiction, if authorized by the governing body of the local jurisdiction; [or]
(II) AT WITHIN 100 FEET OF A SCHOOL BUS STOP LOCATED ON
A HIGHWAY MAINTAINED BY A LOCAL JURISDICTION, IF AUTHORIZED BY THE
GOVERNING BODY OF THE LOCAL JURISDICTION;
[(ii)] (III) On State highways located in a school zone, if authorized
by the State Highway Administration; OR
(IV) AT WITHIN 100 FEET OF A SCHOOL BUS STOP LOCATED ON
A STATE HIGHWAY, IF AUTHORIZED BY THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION.

SENATE BILL 808
(2) A stop sign monitoring system:
(i) May not be used in a local jurisdiction under this section unless
its use is authorized by the governing body of the local jurisdiction by local law enacted
after reasonable notice and a public hearing; and
(ii) May only be used at a location approved by the Prince George’s
County Council.
(3) The county shall prioritize the placement of stop sign monitoring
systems within municipalities that have high violation rates.
(4) Before beginning use of stop sign monitoring systems, an agency shall
publish notice that the agency has adopted the use of stop sign monitoring systems on its
website and in a newspaper of general circulation in the jurisdiction in which the stop sign
monitoring system will be used.
(5) (i) The county shall prominently place signs on highways within the
county providing notice that stop sign monitoring systems are used in the county.
(ii) The State Highway Administration shall place signs prominently
providing notice that stop sign monitoring systems are in use on State highways THE
COUNTY SHALL OBTAIN THE APPROVAL OF THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION
BEFORE PLACING A SIGN ON A STATE HIGHWAY UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH.
(6) A STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEM MAY OPERATE ONLY MONDAY
THROUGH FRIDAY BETWEEN 6:00 A.M. AND 8:00 P.M.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.